Alaska, session 34, HB10.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section 05 to read: 06 SHORT TITLE. This Act may be known as the University of Alaska Faculty 07 Representation Act. 08 * Sec. 2. AS 14.40.120 is amended to read: 09 Sec. 14.40.120. University governed by Board of Regents. The University of 10 Alaska shall be governed by a Board of Regents consisting of 12 [11] regents. 11 * Sec. 3. AS 14.40.120, as amended by sec. 2 of this Act, is amended to read: 12 Sec. 14.40.120. University governed by Board of Regents. The University of 13 Alaska shall be governed by a Board of Regents consisting of 11 [12] regents. 14 * Sec. 4. AS 14.40.130 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 01 (f) In addition to satisfying the requirements in (a) of this section, at least one 02 of the 12 regents must be a current full-time faculty member who is employed at and 03 has acquired tenure at the University of Alaska Anchorage, the University of Alaska 04 Fairbanks, or the University of Alaska Southeast based on the guidelines of that 05 campus. A person appointed as a regent under this subsection forfeits the office if the 06 person is no longer a full-time, tenured faculty member. The governor shall appoint a 07 successor from the list of faculty member nominees submitted under AS 14.40.150(c) 08 within 60 days after a forfeiture or vacancy in the office, subject to confirmation by 09 the legislature under AS 14.40.150(a). 10 * Sec. 5. AS 14.40.140 is amended to read: 11 Sec. 14.40.140. Term of office. Except for a student regent as specified in 12 AS 14.40.150(b) and a faculty member regent as specified in AS 14.40.150(c), the 13 term of office of a regent is eight years. The term of office begins on the first Monday 14 in February of the year in which the appointment is made. Each regent serves until a 15 successor is appointed and qualifies. 16 * Sec. 6. AS 14.40.140, as amended by sec. 5 of this Act, is amended to read: 17 Sec. 14.40.140. Term of office. Except for a student regent as specified in 18 AS 14.40.150(b) [AND A FACULTY MEMBER REGENT AS SPECIFIED IN 19 AS 14.40.150(c)], the term of office of a regent is eight years. The term of office 20 begins on the first Monday in February of the year in which the appointment is made. 21 Each regent serves until a successor is appointed and qualifies. 22 * Sec. 7. AS 14.40.150 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 23 (c) At least one member of the Board of Regents must be a faculty member. 24 The faculty member shall be appointed from a list of nominees submitted to the 25 governor. The governor shall make the appointment from the list within 60 days after 26 the list is submitted. The list must consist of the names of two faculty members 27 selected by each of the three faculty senates of the University of Alaska, for a total of 28 six nominees, after an election is held by each faculty senate. Elections shall be 29 conducted under rules established by the Office of the Governor. The term of office of 30 a regent appointed under this subsection is two years. The term of office begins June 1 31 of the year in which the appointment is made. An appointment of a successor made 01 under AS 14.40.130(f) shall be for the unexpired term of the original appointee. 02 * Sec. 8. AS 14.40.200 is amended to read: 03 Sec. 14.40.200. Quorum. Corporate business may not be transacted at any 04 meeting of the Board of Regents unless at least seven [SIX] regents are present, the 05 majority of the whole board to approve the same. 06 * Sec. 9. AS 14.40.200, as amended by sec. 8 of this Act, is amended to read: 07 Sec. 14.40.200. Quorum. Corporate business may not be transacted at any 08 meeting of the Board of Regents unless at least six [SEVEN] regents are present, the 09 majority of the whole board to approve the same. 10 * Sec. 10. AS 14.40.130(f) and 14.40.150(c) are repealed. 11 * Sec. 11. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 12 read: 13 TRANSITION: INITIAL APPOINTMENT. The University of Alaska shall hold 14 elections for nominees and submit the list of nominees to the governor as required by 15 AS 14.40.150(c), added by sec. 7 of this Act, on or before February 1, 2027. 16 * Sec. 12. Sections 3, 6, 9, and 10 of this Act take effect February 1, 2033. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.